zh-TW: 蠟建議蠟燭應用: 容器蠟燭; 浮水蠟燭; 模具蠟燭 (一般); 戶外蠟燭; 柱狀蠟燭; 雕塑/精細模具蠟燭; 錐形蠟燭; 茶蠟; 祈願蠟燭; 融蠟/香氛蠟塔; 其他
es: Aplicación recomendada de velas de cera: Velas en recipiente; Velas flotantes; Velas moldeadas (general); Velas de exterior; Velas de pilar; Moldes esculturales/detallados; Velas cónicas; Velitas de té; Velas votivas; Cera para derretir/pastillas; Otro
ko: 왁스 권장 양초 용도: 컨테이너 캔들; 플로팅 캔들; 몰드형 캔들(일반); 아웃도어 캔들; 필라 캔들; 조각/디테일 몰드; 테이퍼 캔들; 티라이트; 보티브 캔들; 왁스 멜트/타르트; 기타
pt-BR: Cera aplicação recomendada para velas: Velas em recipientes; Velas flutuantes; Velas moldadas (geral); Velas para uso externo; Velas de pilar; Moldes esculturais/detalhados; Velas cônicas; Velas rechaud; Velas votivas; Pastilhas de cera/tarts; Outros
lt-LT: Vaško rekomenduojama žvakių programa: Žvakės indeliuose; Plaukiojančios žvakės; Lietos žvakės (bendrosios); Lauko žvakės; Stulpo formos žvakės; Skulptūrinės / detalios formos; Kūginės žvakės; Arbatinės žvakutės; Votų žvakės; Vaško tirpučiai; Kita
zh-CN: 蜡推荐蜡烛应用: 容器蜡烛; 水浮蜡烛; 模具蜡烛（通用）; 户外蜡烛; 柱形蜡烛; 雕塑/细节模具; 锥形蜡烛; 茶蜡; 祈愿蜡烛; 融蜡/蜡块; 其他
fr: Usage recommandé de la cire à bougie: Bougies en contenant; Bougies flottantes; Bougies moulées (général); Bougies d’extérieur; Bougies piliers; Moules sculpturaux/détaillés; Chandelles; Bougies chauffe-plat; Bougies votives; Galets/Fondants parfumés; Autre
pt-PT: Aplicação recomendada da cera para velas: Velas de recipiente; Velas flutuantes; Velas moldadas (geral); Velas de exterior; Velas de pilar; Moldes esculturais/detalhados; Velas cónicas; Velas lamparina; Velas votivas; Ceras para derreter/pastilhas; Outro
nl: Was aanbevolen kaarsengebruik: Potkaarsen; Drijvende kaarsen; Gegoten kaarsen (algemeen); Buitenkaarsen; Stompkaarsen; Sculpturale/gedetailleerde vormen; Dinerkaarsen; Waxinelichtjes; Votiefkaarsen; Waxmelts/-tarts; Overige
vi: Ứng dụng sáp nến khuyên dùng: Nến hũ; Nến thả nổi; Nến đổ khuôn (chung); Nến ngoài trời; Nến trụ; Khuôn nghệ thuật/chi tiết; Nến côn; Nến tealight; Nến cốc nhỏ; Sáp thơm (melts/tarts); Khác
de: Empfohlene Kerzenart für das Wachs: Kerzen im Glas; Schwimmkerzen; Gegossene Kerzen (allgemein); Outdoor-Kerzen; Stumpenkerzen; Skulptur-/Detailformen; Stabkerzen; Teelichter; Votivkerzen; Duftwachs-Melts/-Tarts; Sonstige
ro-RO: Aplicarea recomandată a cerii pentru lumânări: Lumânări în recipiente; Lumânări plutitoare; Lumânări turnate în matriță (general); Lumânări de exterior; Lumânări stâlp; Matrițe sculpturale/cu detalii; Lumânări conice; Lumânări tip pastilă; Lumânări votive; Ceară parfumată topită/tarte; Altele
hr-HR: Vosak koji se preporuča za svijeće: Svijeće u posudi; Plutajuće svijeće; Oblikovane svijeće u kalupu (općenito); Vanjske svijeće; Stupne svijeće; Skulpturalni / detaljni kalupi; Visoke svijeće; Lučice; Zavjetne svijeće; Vosak za topljenje / tartovi; Ostalo
pl: Zalecane zastosowanie wosku do świec: Świece w pojemnikach; Świece pływające; Świece z formy (ogólne); Świece zewnętrzne; Świece pieńkowe; Rzeźby/formy szczegółowe; Świece stożkowe; Podgrzewacze (tealighty); Świece wotywne; Woski do kominków; Inne
cs: Doporučené použití vosku pro výrobu svíček: Svíčky ve skle / v nádobách; Plovoucí svíčky; Odlévané svíčky (obecně); Venkovní svíčky; Válcové svíčky; Sochařské / detailní formy; Kuželové svíčky; Čajové svíčky; Votivní svíčky; Vonné vosky / voskové koláčky; Jiné
nb: Voks anbefalt for påføring av stearinlys: Beholderlys; Flytelys; Støpte lys (generelt); Utendørslys; Kubbelys; Skulpturelle/detaljerte former; Kronelys; Telys; Votivlys; Vokssmelter/voksterter; Annet
fi: Vahan suositeltu käyttötapa: Astiakynttilät; Kelluvat kynttilät; Valetut kynttilät (yleinen); Ulkokynttilät; Pöytäkynttilät; Veistokselliset/yksityiskohtaiset muotit; Kruunukynttilät; Lämpökynttilät; Votiivikynttilät; Vahasulat/vahatortut; Muu
it: Applicazione consigliata della cera per le candele: Candele in contenitore; Candele galleggianti; Candele stampate (in generale); Candele da esterno; Candele a colonna; Stampi scultorei/di precisione; Candele coniche; Lumini; Candele votive; Cere da fondere/in cialde; Altro
en: Wax recommended candle application: Container candles; Floating candles; Molded candles (general); Outdoor candles; Pillar candles; Sculptural/detail molds; Tapers; Tea lights; Votive candles; Wax melts/tarts; Other
hu: Viasz ajánlott gyertya alkalmazás: Tégelyes gyertyák; Úszógyertyák; Öntött gyertyák (általános); Kültéri gyertyák; Tömbgyertyák; Szobor-/részletes öntőformák; Szálgyertyák; Teamécsesek; Fogadalmi gyertyák; Illatviasz olvadékok/pasztillák; Egyéb
th: แว๊กซ์แนะนำแอพพลิเคชั่นเทียน: เทียนในภาชนะ; เทียนลอยน้ำ; เทียนขึ้นรูป (ทั่วไป); เทียนกลางแจ้ง; เทียนแท่ง; แม่พิมพ์ประติมากรรม/รายละเอียด; เทียนเกลียว; เทียนทีไลต์; เทียนโหวต; แว็กซ์ละลาย/แว็กซ์ทาร์ต; อื่นๆ
tr: Balmumu önerilen mum uygulaması: Kap mumları; Yüzen mumlar; Kalıp mumlar (genel); Dış mekan mumları; Sütun mumlar; Heykelsi/detaylı kalıplar; Şamdan mumları; Tealight mumlar; Adak mumları; Eritme mumlar/tartlar; Diğer
bg-BG: Препоръчително приложение на восъчни свещи: Свещи в съдове; Плаващи свещи; Формовани свещи (общо); Свещи за открито; Свещи тип стълб; Скулптурни/детайлни форми; Тънки свещи; Чаени свещи; Оброчни свещи; Восъчни стопилки/тартове; Други
da: Anbefalet anvendelse for stearinvoks: Beholderlys; Flydelys; Støbte lys (generelt); Udendørslys; Bloklys; Skulpturelle/detaljerede forme; Kertelys; Fyrfadslys; Votivlys; Duftvoks; Andet
sk-SK: Odporúčaná aplikácia vosku na sviečky: Sviečky v nádobe; Plávajúce sviečky; Odlievané sviečky (všeobecne); Vonkajšie sviečky; Stĺpcové sviečky; Sochárske/detailné formy; Kónické sviečky; Čajové sviečky; Votívne sviečky; Vonné vosky/rozpúšťacie vosky; Iné
sl-SI: Priporočena uporaba voska za sveče: Sveče v posodi; Plavajoče sveče; Odlite sveče (splošno); Zunanje sveče; Stebrne sveče; Kiparski/detajlni kalupi; Stožčaste sveče; Čajne sveče; Votivne sveče; Vosek za topljenje/kolački; Drugo
el: Συνιστώμενη εφαρμογή κεριού: Κεριά σε δοχείο; Επιπλέοντα κεριά; Χυτά κεριά (γενικά); Κεριά εξωτερικού χώρου; Κεριά κολόνες; Καλούπια γλυπτών/λεπτομερειών; Κεριά κηροπήγιου; Ρεσό (Tea lights); Αναθηματικά κεριά; Κεριά για λιώσιμο/tarts; Άλλο
ja: ワックス推奨キャンドル用途: コンテナキャンドル; フローティングキャンドル; モールドキャンドル (全般); アウトドアキャンドル; ピラーキャンドル; 彫刻/ディテールモールド; テーパーキャンドル; ティーライト; ボーティブキャンドル; ワックスメルト/タルト; その他
ru: Рекомендуемое применение воска для свечей: Контейнерные свечи; Плавающие свечи; Формовые свечи (общие); Уличные свечи; Цилиндрические свечи; Скульптурные/детализированные формы; Конические свечи; Чайные свечи; Вотивные свечи; Восковые саше/плавы; Другое
sv: Rekommenderad ljustyp för vaxet: Ljus i behållare; Flytljus; Gjutna ljus (allmänt); Utomhusljus; Blockljus; Skulpturala/detaljerade formar; Kronljus; Värmeljus; Votivljus; Doftvax/vaxkakor; Övrigt